Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.070

Daily remittance of moneys to treasury—Liability of officers for noncompliance.

If any officer fails to comply with the provisions of RCW 43.01.050, he or she shall be liable to the state upon his or her official bond in a sum equal to ten percent annual interest on the funds for such time as he or she retained them.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5003; 1965 c 8 s 43.01.070. Prior: 1907 c 96 s 3; RRS s 5503.]